New York, session 2025-2026, A10360.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "NY broadband resiliency, public safety and quality act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. The legislature hereby finds and declares 4 that access to high-speed broadband service is a necessity and essential 5 to participation in the economy, education and civic life. Closing gaps 6 in broadband availability is a matter of deployment, affordability and 7 ensuring networks are resilient, high quality and facilitate public 8 safety. Because voice over internet protocol has replaced traditional 9 voice telephone service for a large segment of the population, ensuring 10 its reliability is in the public interest and consistent with public 11 safety goals. State regulators require unambiguous authority and a clear 12 mandate to establish and enforce appropriate oversight and regulation of 13 broadband and voice over internet protocol service in order to meet the 14 state's goals of universal, high-quality and affordable access. 15 § 3. The public service law is amended by adding a new article 12 to 16 read as follows: 17 ARTICLE 12 18 BROADBAND RESILIENCY, PUBLIC SAFETY AND QUALITY ACT 19 Section 250. Definitions. 20 251. Oversight of broadband and VoIP service. 21 § 250. Definitions. For the purposes of this article the following 22 terms shall have the following meanings: 23 1. "Broadband service" shall mean a mass-market retail service that 24 provides the capability to transmit data to and receive data from all or 25 substantially all internet endpoints, including any capabilities that 26 are incidental to and enable the operation of the communications 27 service, but shall not include dial-up service. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14926-01-6 A. 10360 2 1 2. "Internet service provider" shall mean any person, business or 2 organization qualified to do business in this state that provides indi- 3 viduals, corporations or other entities with the ability to connect to 4 the internet with a broadband service. 5 3. "Voice over Internet Protocol" or "VoIP" shall mean an intercon- 6 nected voice over internet protocol service that: 7 (a) Enables real-time, two-way voice communications; 8 (b) Requires a broadband connection from the user's location; 9 (c) Requires internet protocol-compatible customer premises equipment; 10 and 11 (d) Permits users to receive calls that originate on the public 12 switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched 13 telephone network. 14 § 251. Oversight of broadband and VoIP service. 1. The public service 15 commission shall be authorized to exercise oversight regarding broadband 16 and VoIP service. 17 2. The public service commission shall promulgate rules and regu- 18 lations necessary to implement effective oversight of broadband and VoIP 19 service, including but not limited to the following: 20 (a) Ensuring the resiliency and reliability of broadband infrastruc- 21 ture and requiring internet service providers to submit information 22 related to network reliability, including outage reporting. 23 (b) Ensuring the public safety and adequacy of networks by exercising 24 oversight of internet service providers' emergency preparedness and 25 plans for post-emergency network restoration, including establishing 26 minimum power back-up requirements and requiring all internet service 27 providers to maintain networks sufficiently to ensure reliable and safe 28 communications services. 29 (c) Requiring internet service providers to report data on the pricing 30 and adoption of VoIP and broadband service. 31 3. The public service commission shall conduct evaluations and audits 32 of facilities and infrastructure used to provide high-speed internet 33 service and evaluate facilities and infrastructure in regards to areas 34 of public safety, resiliency, broadband and anything else the commission 35 deems relevant to achieving goals of resiliency, quality and public 36 safety in broadband service, as well as the overall goals of universal 37 access and affordability of broadband service. 38 4. The public service commission shall report annually to the legisla- 39 ture on progress towards achieving goals of resiliency, public safety 40 and quality of broadband and VoIP service. 41 § 4. The public service commission shall initiate a proceeding within 42 three months of the effective date of this act to establish minimum 43 network service quality benchmarks including but not limited to stand- 44 ards for the number of days to complete service orders, outage repair 45 standards including a maximum number of hours for service restoration, 46 standards for customer service including time allowed to resolve bill- 47 ing-related inquiries as well as ensuring a clear and timely way for 48 subscribers to reach customer service representatives. Such proceeding 49 shall also determine appropriate reporting and enforcement related to 50 these areas. 51 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.